Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 8.16, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Authority. new text begin (a) new text end The attorney general, or any deputy, assistant, or special assistant attorney general whom the attorney general authorizes in writing, has the authority in any county of the state to subpoena and require the production ofnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end any records ofnew text begin :new text end new text begin (i)new text end telephone companies, cellular phone companies,new text begin andnew text end paging companiesdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (ii)new text end subscribers of private computer networksnew text begin ,new text end including Internet service providers or computer bulletin board systemsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (iii)new text end electric companies, gas companies,new text begin andnew text end water utilitiesdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (iv)new text end chemical suppliersdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (v)new text end hotels and motelsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (vi)new text end pawn shopsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (vii)new text end airlines, buses, taxis, and other entities engaged in the business of transporting peopledeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end and new text begin (viii)new text end freight companies, self-service storage facilities, warehousing companies, package delivery companies, and other entities engaged in the businesses of transport, storage, or deliverydeleted text begin , anddeleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2) wage and employment records; new text end new text begin (3)new text end records of the existence of safe deposit box account numbers and customer savings and checking account numbers maintained by financial institutions and safe deposit companiesnew text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (4) insurance records related to claim settlementnew text end . new text begin (b) new text end Subpoenas may only be issued for records that are relevant to an ongoing legitimate law enforcement investigation.